Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2916XC (2) 91 da/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 715E.1, subsections 1, 2, and 8, Code 1 2025, are amended by striking the subsections. 2 Sec. 2. Section 715E.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsections: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. âFarm animalâ means an animal belonging 5 to the bovine, caprine, ovine, or porcine species; farm deer as 6 defined in section 170.1; ostriches, rheas, or emus; turkeys, 7 geese, chickens, or other domestic poultry; or a horse, pony, 8 mule, jenny, donkey, or hinny. 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 3B. âFarm commodityâ means a farm animal, 10 farm crop, or honey. 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 3C. a. âFarm cropâ means a plant used for 12 food, animal feed, fiber, or oil, including a forage or cereal 13 plant. 14 b. âFarm cropâ includes but is not limited to alfalfa, 15 barley, buckwheat, corn, flax, forage, millet, oats, popcorn, 16 rye, sorghum, soybeans, sunflowers, wheat, and grasses used for 17 forage or silage. 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 3D. a. âFarm equipmentâ means a device 19 or an attachment to a device designed and manufactured to be 20 principally used for farming, including the production, care, 21 or harvesting of a farm commodity. 22 b. âFarm equipmentâ includes but is not limited to tractors; 23 trailers; combines; tillage, planting, and cultivating 24 implements; balers; irrigation implements; injection and 25 application devices; manure haulers and spreaders; and 26 all-terrain vehicles. 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 3E. a. âFarm structureâ means a building 28 or other structure used in farming, including the production of 29 farm commodities. 30 b. âFarm structureâ includes but is not limited to the 31 principal residence of a farmer, a formed or unformed structure 32 that is part of an animal feeding operation as defined in 33 section 459.102 and related pipes and manure stockpiles, a 34 barn, a stable, a storage crib, a structure used to store seeds 35 -1- LSB 2916XC (2) 91 da/ns 1/ 6 S.F. _____ or grain, an outbuilding, and a shed. 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 3F. âFarmerâ means the person who is 2 actively engaged in farming as defined in section 9H.1. 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 3G. a. âFarmsteadâ means real property 4 consisting of forty or more contiguous acres, if all of the 5 following apply: 6 (1) The real property is owned or leased by a farmer. 7 (2) The real property is used by the farmer for farming, 8 including the production of a farm commodity. 9 (3) At least fifteen thousand dollars was generated from the 10 sale of farm commodities produced on the real property in the 11 last calendar year. 12 b. âFarmsteadâ includes but is not limited to a crop field 13 or pastureland. 14 c. âFarmsteadâ does not include any real property located 15 within the corporate limits of a city. 16 Sec. 3. Section 715E.1, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 9. âSurveillance deviceâ means a camera or electronic 19 equipment that transmits or records images an image , sounds 20 sound , or data if the transmission or recording is capable of 21 reasonably identifying any of the following: 22 a. The identity, physical appearance, conduct, or voice of 23 an individual. 24 b. The species of an agricultural a farm animal. 25 c. The type or use of farm equipment. 26 d. The type or use of a farm structure. 27 c. e. The unique physical characteristics of land or an 28 improvement to land. 29 Sec. 4. Section 715E.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. Controls the flight of remotely piloted aircraft over 32 a secure farmstead area , if the secure farmstead area is 33 not owned or leased by the person, and the remotely piloted 34 aircraft remains over the secure farmstead area within a 35 -2- LSB 2916XC (2) 91 da/ns 2/ 6 S.F. _____ secured area of four hundred feet surrounding a farm animal, 1 farm equipment, or a farm structure located on the farmstead . 2 However, the secured area shall not include any space that is 3 in the corporate limits of a city. 4 Sec. 5. Section 715E.4, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 5 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 b. Controls the flight of a remotely piloted aircraft 7 equipped with a surveillance device over a secure farmstead 8 area , if the secure farmstead area is not owned or leased by 9 the person, and the remotely piloted aircraft remains over the 10 secure farmstead area within a secured area of four hundred 11 feet surrounding a farm animal, farm equipment, or a farm 12 structure located on the farmstead . However, the secured area 13 shall not include any space that is in the corporate limits of 14 a city. 15 Sec. 6. Section 715E.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 1. A person who is the owner or lessee of a homestead 18 or secure farmstead area may petition the district court to 19 obtain an order for a temporary injunction to prevent the 20 respondent from using any remotely piloted aircraft equipped 21 with a surveillance device, if a preponderance of evidence 22 indicates that the respondent is harassing the petitioner by 23 controlling the flight of the remotely piloted aircraft over 24 the personâs homestead or secure farmstead area in violation of 25 section 715E.3 or 715E.4 . The court shall grant the temporary 26 injunction for not more than two years. The court may continue 27 the injunction upon a petition filed by the petitioner with the 28 court prior to the orderâs expiration. 29 Sec. 7. Section 715E.5, subsection 3, paragraph b, 30 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b), Code 2025, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 (b) The person is an the owner of an agricultural animal a 33 farm animal, farm equipment, or a farm structure that may be 34 identified in the recording. 35 -3- LSB 2916XC (2) 91 da/ns 3/ 6 S.F. _____ Sec. 8. Section 715E.5, subsection 3, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) A person cannot claim an ownership interest in a 3 retrievable image, sound, or data that includes an image, 4 sound, or data that may identify another individual, an 5 agricultural animal a farm animal, farm equipment, or a farm 6 structure owned by another person, or land or an improvement 7 owned by another person, unless that other individual or person 8 consents. 9 Sec. 9. Section 715E.6, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, 10 is amended to read as follows: 11 Sections 715E.3 and 715E.4 do not prohibit a person from 12 controlling a remotely piloted aircraft flying over a personâs 13 homestead or secure farmstead area if the person controlling 14 the remotely piloted aircraft is any of the following: 15 Sec. 10. Section 715E.6, subsections 1 and 9, Code 2025, are 16 amended to read as follows: 17 1. A person who acts with the consent of the owner of the 18 homestead or secure farmstead area . 19 9. The owner or lessee of the homestead or secure farmstead 20 area . 21